Utah statutes.
58-9-604.   Control by funeral service director.

A funeral service director may control the disposition of the decedent and recover reasonable charges if:

(1) (a)  the funeral service director has actual knowledge that none of the persons described in Section 58-9-602 exist; or

(b)  after reasonable efforts the funeral service director is not able to contact any of the persons described in Section 58-9-602; and

(2)  the appropriate public official charged with arranging the disposition of deceased persons fails to assume responsibility for disposition of the decedent within 36 hours after receiving written notice from the funeral service director.

